Utah statutes.
34-30-1.   Citizens to be given preference -- Provision to be included in contracts.

In employing workmen in the construction of public works by the state or any county or municipality, or by persons contracting with the state or any county or municipality, preference shall be given citizens of the United States, or those having declared their intention of becoming citizens. In each contract for the construction of public works a provision shall be inserted to the effect that, if the provisions of this section are not complied with, the contract shall be void.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

